Utah statutes.
62A-15-708.   Mechanical restraints -- Clinical record.

Mechanical restraints may not be applied to a child unless it is determined, by the local mental health authority or its designee in conjunction with the child's current treating mental health professional, that they are required by the needs of that child.  Every use of a mechanical restraint and the reasons for that use shall be made a part of the child's clinical record, under the signature of the local mental health authority, its designee, and the child's current treating mental health professional.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 8, 2002 Special Session 5

